Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 8

Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt

66-8-101. Right of redemption — Waiver.

Real estate sold for debt shall be redeemable at any time within two (2) years after such sale:

Where it is sold under execution;

Where it is sold under any decree, judgment, or order of a court of chancery, whether founded upon a foreclosure of a mortgage, or deed of trust, or otherwise, unless, upon application of the complainant, the court orders that the property be sold on a credit of not less than six (6) months, nor more than two (2) years; and that, upon confirmation thereof by the court, no right of redemption or repurchase shall exist in the debtor or the debtor's creditor, but that the title of the purchaser shall be absolute; and

Where it is sold under a deed of trust or mortgage without a judicial sentence, unless the right of redemption is expressly waived by the deed or mortgage; and a waiver of the “equity of redemption,” or a waiver using words of similar import, shall be sufficient to waive the right of redemption afforded by this section in all deeds of trust and mortgages, whether heretofore or hereafter existing.

Code 1858, § 2124 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 2; 1823, ch. 24, § 2; 1832, ch. 36, §§ 1, 2; 1833, ch. 47, § 2; 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, § 3; 1857-1858, ch. 46, § 1); Shan., § 3811; mod. Code 1932, § 7736; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7736; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-801; Acts 1984, ch. 774, § 1; 1991, ch. 470, § 4.

Cross-References. Deed on redemption, §26-5-113.

Injunction against sale under trust deed or mortgage, title 29, ch. 23, part 2.

Judgment by motion, title 25, ch. 3.

Redemption of property sold to collect on forfeiture of recognizance, §40-11-215.

Right to redeem from sale to enforce vendor's lien, §66-10-105.

Sale on execution, title 26, ch. 5.

Suspension of foreclosure proceeding for active military personnel, §26-1-111.

Tax sales, title 67, ch. 5, part 25.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 277, 278, 476.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 25; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 48; 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 2, 5-17, 25, 29; 24 Tenn. Juris., Trusts and Trustees, § 19.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Notice in Tennessee (Robert Banks, Jr. and Elizabeth T. Collins), 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1991).

Simple Real Estate Foreclosures Made Complex: The Byzantine Tennessee Process (John A. Walker, Jr.), 62 Tenn. L. Rev. 231 (1995).

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

Tennessee Homeowners' Post Foreclosure Auction Right to Cure Under 11 U.S.C. §§ 1322(b) and (c), 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 453 (1997).

Waiver of Redemption Rights in Tennessee Mortgages: Discarding the Contracts Clause and Common-Law Concepts, 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 733 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of waiver provisions, OAG 84-122, 1984 Tenn. AG LEXIS 224 (4/11/84); OAG 84-267, 1984 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (9/21/84).

66-8-102. Period in which redeemable.

Real estate sold for debt and made redeemable shall continue redeemable to the debtor and the debtor's creditors for two (2) years after the sale, upon the terms set forth in this chapter, no matter how often it had been previously redeemed.

Code 1858, § 2130 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 5; 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, § 9); Shan., § 3817; Code 1932, § 7742; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-802.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 619.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

66-8-103. Waiver of right in mortgage or trust deed.

The right of redemption does not extend to any sale under and by virtue of a power contained in any deed of trust, mortgage, or other instrument, whereby the right is waived or surrendered by such mortgage or conveyance.

Code 1858, § 2125 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 46, § 1); Shan., § 3812; Code 1932, § 7737; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-803.

Cross-References. Waste and trespass, title 29, ch. 36.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Adverse Possession, § 25; 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 24, 25.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

Waiver of Redemption Rights in Tennessee Mortgages: Discarding the Contracts Clause and Common-Law Concepts, 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 733 (1989).

Collateral References.

Appeal or staying execution on judgment, constitutionality and construction of statute as to effect of, on right to redeem from judicial sale. 107 A.L.R. 879.

Deed from mortgagor or privy to mortgage holder as extinguishing equity of redemption. 129 A.L.R. 1435.

Junior mortgagee's equity of redemption as affected by reacquisition by mortgagor or his grantee of title through foreclosure of first mortgage. 51 A.L.R. 445, 111 A.L.R. 1285.

66-8-104. Timber on land subject to redemption — Waste.

No person holding the temporary title to real estate, subject to redemption, shall use more of the wood growing thereon than the timber required to keep the improvements in good repair, and firewood necessary for those occupying the same; nor shall that person destroy or remove from the land any fencing or buildings.

Code 1858, § 2133 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 170, § 1); Shan., § 3820; Code 1932, § 7745; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-804.

Collateral References.

Purchaser of timber from mortgagor, rights and liabilities of. 57 A.L.R. 454.

Right of mortgagor or owner of equity of redemption to cut timber. 57 A.L.R. 451.

66-8-105. Remedies against waste.

The person having the right to redeem such real estate may file a bill in chancery for an injunction to restrain waste; and, after redemption, may recover damages occasioned by such waste.

Code 1858, § 2134 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 170, § 2); Shan., § 3821; Code 1932, § 7746; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-805.

Collateral References.

Oil or gas resources of land, exploitation of, by mortgagor, or purchaser or lessee subsequently to mortgage, as waste as against mortgagee. 95 A.L.R. 957.

Receiver, right of mortgagee to appointment of, to prevent waste. 26 A.L.R. 55, 36 A.L.R. 609, 55 A.L.R. 533, 87 A.L.R. 1008, 111 A.L.R. 730, 82 A.L.R.2d 1075.

Third person, remedy of mortgagee or other holder of lien on real property against, for damage to or trespass on property. 37 A.L.R. 1120, 48 A.L.R. 1156.

Trustee's duty to bondholders to prevent waste. 90 A.L.R.2d 501.

66-8-106. Purchase price paid on redemption.

Any debtor whose interest in real estate has been so sold, and is subject to redemption, may redeem the interest by paying to the purchaser, or to anyone claiming under the purchaser, the amount bid or paid by the purchaser, with interest thereon at the current composite prime rate as published by the federal reserve board as of the date of purchase per annum, together with all other lawful charges.

Code 1858, § 2126 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 2; 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, § 6); Shan., § 3813; Code 1932, § 7738; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-806; Acts 1983, ch. 182, § 1.

Cross-References. Deed on redemption, §26-5-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 9-21.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

66-8-107. Advance on bid by purchasing creditor.

If the purchaser is a bona fide creditor by judgment, decree, or debt acknowledged by deed, and, within twenty (20) days after the sale, the purchaser makes an advance on the purchaser's bid, and credits the purchaser's debt by depositing a receipt therefor with the clerk of the court in which the judgment or decree was rendered, or, if the sale was under a deed of trust or mortgage, the purchaser acknowledges a receipt for such advance before the county clerk for registration, and causes the same to be registered in the county where the land lies, then the purchaser shall hold the property subject to redemption at the price bid and such an advance, just as if the whole sum had been bid at the time of the sale.

Code 1858, § 2127 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 4; 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, §§ 6, 7); Shan., § 3814; Code 1932, § 7739; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-807.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 12 of the Rules of Practice and Procedure of the Shelby County Chancery Court.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 4, 10, 12, 14, 21.

66-8-108. Redemption from redeeming creditor.

A bona fide creditor, who redeems from the purchaser at the sale, shall hold the property subject to redemption by the original debtor, or any other of the original debtor's creditors, upon the same terms on which it was redeemable in the hands of the first purchaser or any person claiming under that purchaser; that is to say, by the party proposing to redeem paying or tendering to the person holding the land the amount of money paid or credited by that purchaser, with interest at the current composite prime rate as published by the federal reserve board as of the date of purchase per annum thereon, and also agreeing to pay to the debtor the further sum of ten percent (10%) or more on the sum bid for the land when sold, or crediting the debtor with that amount or more on the debt owing to the purchaser by the debtor, or with a sum equal to ten percent (10%) or more upon the judgment of the creditor, at the election of the creditor.

Code 1858, § 2128 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 3; 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, §§ 6, 9); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 84; Shan., § 3815; Code 1932, § 7740; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-808; Acts 1983, ch. 182, § 2.

Cross-References. Deed on redemption, §26-5-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 12, 21.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

66-8-109. Advance on redemption price by redeeming creditor.

When any such creditor has redeemed land from the original purchaser, or from one who has previously redeemed, that creditor may, within twenty (20) days after such redemption, advance upon the bid any sum to the extent of that creditor's debt or debts, just as if such creditor had been the original purchaser.

Code 1858, § 2129 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 181, § 2); Shan., § 3816; Code 1932, § 7741; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-809.

66-8-110. Total amount payable on redemption.

The person proposing to redeem shall always pay, or tender, to the holder of the land, the amount of money lawfully paid by the holder, with interest thereon, at the current composite prime rate as published by the federal reserve board as of the date of purchase per annum; and, if the holder is a creditor, shall pay to the debtor or credit the debtor's debt with a sum equal to ten percent (10%) or more on the sum bid at the original sale, or with a sum equal to ten percent (10%) or more upon the judgment of the creditor, at the election of the creditor.

Code 1858, § 2131 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 11, § 4; 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, § 9); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 84; Shan., § 3818; Code 1932, § 7743; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-810; Acts 1983, ch. 182, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 21, 22.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-8-111. Unauthorized increase of bid.

In no case shall the holder or claimant of the property increase such holder's or claimant's bid against the debtor, or any bona fide creditor offering to redeem the real estate, except as provided in §66-8-110.

Code 1858, § 2132 (deriv. Acts 1842 (E.S.), ch. 6, § 9); Shan., § 3819; Code 1932, § 7744; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-811.

66-8-112. Rent during redemption period.

The debtor, permitted by the purchaser to remain in possession, shall not be liable for rent from the date of the sale to the time of the redemption; and if the purchaser or the purchaser's assignee takes possession under the purchase, upon redemption by the debtor, the debtor shall have a credit for the fair rent of the premises during the time they were in the purchaser's possession.

Code 1858, § 2135 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 121); Shan., § 3822; Code 1932, § 7747; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-812.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 476.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 48; 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, § 33.

66-8-113. Payment of redemption money through clerk of court — Failure of clerk to pay over.

Where the purchaser is absent from the purchaser's usual place of residence, so that personal tender to the purchaser is prevented, or resides out of the county where the land lies, the debtor, or party entitled to redeem, may pay the redemption money to the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the land lies, or in case the land is sold by the judgment or decree of a court, then to the clerk of the court from which the same is sold, to be held by the clerk for the person entitled to it, and such payment shall be good to all intents and purposes.

If the clerk fails or refuses to pay over such money to the person entitled to it, on application, it may be recovered by motion, in the same way as money paid to the clerk on execution, and not paid over on demand.

Code 1858, §§ 2136, 2137 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 179, §§ 2, 3); Acts 1870, ch. 111, § 1; 1889, ch. 83, § 1; 1897, ch. 132, § 1; Shan., §§ 3823, 3824; Code 1932, §§ 7748, 7749; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-813, 64-814.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 3.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, §§ 20, 21.

Law Reviews.

Inadequate Trust Deed Waivers of the Statutory Right of Redemption: The Nightmare Reoccurs (George T. Lewis, III), 22 No. 5, Tenn. B.J. 27 (1986).

66-8-114. Enforcement of right to redemption.

If the purchaser, or the purchaser's vendee, fails or refuses to reconvey to such party entitled and offering to redeem, as set forth in this chapter, such party so paying or tendering payment shall have the right to file in the chancery court a bill to enforce the purchaser's rights of redemption.

In any suit to enforce a right of redemption brought by a transferee from the debtor:

The debtor shall be made a party;

The suit shall be dismissed on the motion of any party if it appears that the transferee is engaged in speculation or profiteering in such rights of redemption;

Such speculation and profiteering shall be presumed if it appears that the transfer of the right of redemption was made for a consideration less than the fair market value of the real property minus the amount the debtor would have been required to pay to redeem the property under this chapter; and

The party seeking to redeem the real property shall complete the tender required by this chapter by paying the amount required for redemption to the clerk of the court.

It is the intent of this subsection (b) to further the public policy of the state to protect the interests of owners of real property subject to debt and to prohibit the profiteering and speculation in rights of redemption.

The purpose of this subsection (b) is remedial and it shall be construed to apply to any existing rights of redemption. This subsection (b), however, shall not apply to any rights of redemption arising out of judicial foreclosures or tax sales.

Code 1932, § 7750; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-815; Acts 1987, ch. 385, §§ 1-3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, § 23.

Law Reviews.

Property — Mortgages — State Redemption Statutes Not Applicable to Foreclosure by the United States on FHA Insured Mortgages, 23 Vand. L. Rev. 1384 (1970).

Collateral References.

Damages recoverable for real estate mortgagee's refusal to discharge mortgage or give partial release therefrom. 8 A.L.R.4th 853.